Arkansas, session 2025, HB1418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-16-504(b)(1)(A), concerning the
regulation of firearms and ammunition by local government, is amended to read
as follows:
(b)(1)(A) Except as otherwise provided in state or federal law, A a
local unit of government shall not enact any an ordinance or regulation
pertaining to, or regulate in any other manner, the ownership, transfer,
transportation, carrying, or possession of:
(i) firearms, Firearms;
(ii) ammunition Ammunition for firearms,;
(iii) or components Components of firearms,;
(iv) Knives; or
(v) Knife-making components except as otherwise
provided in state or federal law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-54-1411(b)(1)(A), concerning the
regulation of firearms and ammunition by local government, is amended to read
as follows:
*CEB039*
02/04/2025 3:07:41 PM CEB039

HB1418
(b)(1)(A) Except as otherwise provided in state or federal law, A a
local unit of government shall not enact any an ordinance or regulation
pertaining to, or regulate in any other manner, the ownership, transfer,
transportation, carrying, or possession of:
(i) firearms, Firearms;
(ii) ammunition Ammunition for firearms,;
(iii) or components Components of firearms,;
(iv) Knives; or
(v) Knife-making components except as otherwise
provided in state or federal law.


























02/04/2025 3:07:41 PM CEB039